test/src/morphology/N-to_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - то: # Noun 'lake / (fin) järvi' - partial paradigm /Type 1/ - то
     то+N+Sg+Nom: то
     то+N+Sg+Acc: томʼ
     то+N+Sg+Gen: тоʼ
     то+N+Sg+Dat: тонʼ
     то+N+Sg+Loc: тохона
     то+N+Sg+Abl: тоход
     то+N+Sg+Pros: товна
     то+N+Du+Nom: тохоʼ
     то+N+Du+Acc: тохоʼ
     то+N+Du+Gen: тохоʼ
     то+N+Pl+Nom: тоˮ
     то+N+Pl+Acc: то
     то+N+Pl+Gen: тоˮ
     то+N+Pl+Dat: тохоˮ
     то+N+Pl+Loc: тохоˮна
     то+N+Pl+Abl: тохот
     то+N+Pl+Pros: тоˮомна
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: тов
     то+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тов
     то+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тон
     то+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тохон
     то+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тохонан
     то+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: тоходан
     то+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: товнан
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: тохоюн
     то+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: тохоюн
     то+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: тохоюн
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тон
     то+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тон
     то+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тоˮон
     то+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: тохоˮн
     то+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: тохоˮнан
     то+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: тохотан
     то+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тоˮомнан
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: тор
     то+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: томд
     то+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тонд
     то+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: тохонд
     то+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: тохонанд
     то+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: тоходанд
     то+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: товнанд
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: тохоюд
     то+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: тохоюд
     то+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: тохоют
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: тод
     то+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: тод
     то+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: тот
     то+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: тохот
     то+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: тохоˮнат
     то+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: тохотат
     то+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: тоˮомнат
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: тода
     то+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: томда
     то+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: тонда
     то+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: тохонда
     то+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: тохонанда
     то+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: тоходанда
     то+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: товнанда
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: тохоюда
     то+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: тохоюда
     то+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: тохоюта
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: тода
     то+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: тода
     то+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: тота
     то+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: тохота
     то+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: тохоˮната
     то+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: тохотата
     то+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: тоˮомната
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: томиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: томиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: тониʼ
     то+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: тохониʼ
     то+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: тохонаниʼ
     то+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: тоходаниʼ
     то+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: товнаниʼ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: тохоюниʼ
     то+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: тохоюниʼ
     то+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: тохоюниʼ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: тониʼ
     то+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: тониʼ
     то+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: тоˮниʼ
     то+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: тохоˮниʼ
     то+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: тохоˮнаниʼ
     то+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: тохотаниʼ
     то+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: тоˮомнаниʼ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ториʼ
     то+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: томдиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: тондиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: тохондиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: тохонандиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: тоходандиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: товнандиʼ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: тохоюдиʼ
     то+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: тохоюдиʼ
     то+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: тохоютиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: тодиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: тодиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: тотиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: тохотиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: тохоˮнатиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: тохотатиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: тоˮомнатиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: тодиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: томдиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: тондиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: тохондиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: тохонандиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: тоходандиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: товнандиʼ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: тохоюдиʼ
     то+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: тохоюдиʼ
     то+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: тохоютиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: тодиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: тодиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: тотиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: тохотиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: тохоˮнатиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: тохотатиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: тоˮомнатиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: товаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: товаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: тонаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: тохонаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: тохонанаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: тоходанаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: товнанаˮ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: тохоюнаˮ
     то+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: тохоюнаˮ
     то+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: тохоюнаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: тонаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: тонаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: тоˮнаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: тохоˮнаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: тохоˮнанаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: тохотанаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: тоˮомнанаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: тораˮ
     то+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: томдаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: тондаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: тохондаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: тохонандаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: тоходандаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: товнандаˮ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: тохоюдаˮ
     то+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: тохоюдаˮ
     то+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: тохоютаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: тодаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: тодаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: тотаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: тохотаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: тохоˮнатаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: тохотатаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: тоˮомнатаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: тодоʼ
     то+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: томдоʼ
     то+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: тондоʼ
     то+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: тохондоʼ
     то+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: тохонандоʼ
     то+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: тоходандоʼ
     то+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: товнандоʼ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: тохоюдоʼ
     то+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: тохоюдоʼ
     то+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: тохоютоʼ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: тодоʼ
     то+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: тодоʼ
     то+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: тотоʼ
     то+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: тохотоʼ
     то+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: тохоˮнатоʼ
     то+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: тохотатоʼ
     то+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: тоˮомнатоʼ
     то+N+Pred+Abs: тод
     то+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [тодав, тодув]
     то+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [тодав, тодув]
     то+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: тодан
     то+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: тодар
     то+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: тодамд
     то+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: тоданд
     то+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [тодада, тодда]
     то+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: тодамда
     то+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: тоданда
     то+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [тодамиʼ, тодмиʼ]
     то+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [тодамиʼ, тодмиʼ]
     то+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [тоданиʼ, тодниʼ]
     то+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [тодариʼ, тодриʼ]
     то+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: тодамдиʼ
     то+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: тодандиʼ
     то+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [тодадиʼ, тоддиʼ]
     то+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: тодамдиʼ
     то+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: тодандиʼ
     то+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [тодаваˮ, тодваˮ]
     то+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [тодаваˮ, тодваˮ]
     то+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [тоданаˮ, тоднаˮ]
     то+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [тодараˮ, тодраˮ]
     то+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: тодамдаˮ
     то+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: тодандаˮ
     то+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [тодадоʼ, тоддоʼ]
     то+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: тодамдоʼ
     то+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: тодандоʼ
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: тодмʼ
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: тон
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: то
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: тониʼ
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: тодиʼ
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тохоʼ
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: товаˮ
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: тодаˮ
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тоˮ
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: тодамзь
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: тонась
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тось
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: тонинзь
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: тодинзь
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тохонзь
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: товаць
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: тодаць
     то+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тоць
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тов
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тор
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тода
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: томиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ториʼ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тодиʼ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: товаˮ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тораˮ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тодоʼ
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: товась
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: торась
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тодась
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: томинзь
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: торинзь
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тодинзь
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: товаць
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тораць
     то+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тодонзь
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тохоюн
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тохоюд
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тохоюда
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тохоюниʼ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тохоюдиʼ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тохоюдиʼ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тохоюнаˮ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тохоюдаˮ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тохоюдоʼ
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тохоюнась
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тохоюдась
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тохоюдась
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тохоюнинзь
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тохоюдинзь
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тохоюдинзь
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тохоюнаць
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тохоюдаць
     то+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тохоюдонзь
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тон
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тод
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тода
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тониʼ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тодиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тодиʼ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тонаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тодаˮ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тодоʼ
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тонась
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тодась
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тодась
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тонинзь
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тодинзь
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тодинзь
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тонаць
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тодаць
     то+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тодонзь
     то+N+Tra: тоӈэ
     то+N+Car: тосиˮ
     то+N+Equ: тодремʼ
     то+N+Equ+Lat: тодревʼ
